Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
Blocks (005300): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3059 3060

Blocks (980200): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1024 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043

Blocks (980300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047

VTD: Memphis 69-1

VTD: Memphis 69-2

Blocks (009901): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1033 1034 1035 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046

Blocks (009902): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 1016 1023 1024 1025 1026 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018

Blocks (020101): 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1047 1048

VTD: Memphis 70-1

Blocks (010110): 2004 2005 2006 2010 5002 5003 5006 5007 5010 6003 6004

VTD: Memphis 70-2

Blocks (010120): 3005 3006

VTD: Memphis 70-3

VTD: Memphis 71-4

Blocks (009901): 1003 1032 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030

Blocks (010110): 3000

Blocks (010300): 1000 1001 1003 1016

VTD: Memphis 71-5

VTD: Memphis 75-1

Blocks (005300): 3057 3058

Blocks (022220): 1015 1016 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009

VTD: Memphis 75-11

Blocks (022410): 2007 2008 2013 2014 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023

VTD: Memphis 75-5

Blocks (022410): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3013 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4022 4025 5000 5001

VTD: Memphis 75-7

Blocks (022210): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005

Blocks (022310): 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004

VTD: Memphis 82-1

VTD: Memphis 82-2

VTD: Memphis 82-3

VTD: Millington 1

Blocks (020102): 1000 1001 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2007 2008

Blocks (020210): 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3019 3021 3022 3026 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3042 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010

Blocks (020221): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1006 1022 1023 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 2008 2011

Blocks (020300): 2001 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2029 2030 2031 3005 3006 3007 3008 3050

VTD: Millington 2

Blocks (020222): 1019

VTD: Woodstock 2

Blocks (010300): 1002

Blocks (020221): 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2052 2053 2058 2059 2060 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2095

District 87:

Shelby County

VTD: Memphis 56-3

Blocks (009300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010

VTD: Memphis 58-4

Blocks (009700): 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1022 1023 1024

Blocks (011800): 2004 2005 2006 2011 2012 2015 2016 2017 3006 3007 3012 3014 3015

VTD: Memphis 60-2

Blocks (980100): 1074

VTD: Memphis 60-5

Blocks (010500): 1021 1022 1025 1039 1041

Blocks (010620): 3006 3021 3023 3024 3025 3026

Blocks (011020): 1000

Blocks (022600): 1024 1025 1026

Blocks (980100): 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1051 1056 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1076 1077 1078 1105 1106

VTD: Memphis 65-1

Blocks (008500): 1033 1034

Blocks (009300): 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

Blocks (011800): 4000 4011 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017

VTD: Memphis 66

Blocks (009300): 1024 1025 1026 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024

Blocks (009400): 1022 1027 1028 1033 1034 1036 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025

Blocks (009700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1019 1020 1021 1025 1026 2000 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2018

VTD: Memphis 73-1

Blocks (010500): 1013 1014 1015 1018 1019 1020 1026 1027 1028 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1037 1038 1040

Blocks (010620): 3019 3020 3022

VTD: Memphis 73-3

Blocks (010710): 1023 1024

Blocks (010810): 3007 3008

VTD: Memphis 73-4

VTD: Memphis 74-1

Blocks (009700): 2002 2015 2016 2017

Blocks (010710): 1000 1001 1003 1004 1005 1006 2000 3000 3001 3002 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022

Blocks (010720): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

VTD: Memphis 74-2

VTD: Memphis 74-5

Blocks (010710): 1002 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017

Blocks (010810): 3004 3005 3006 3013 3014 3015 3016 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4009

VTD: Memphis 74-9

Blocks (010630): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016

Blocks (010810): 2006 2007 2008 2009 4005 4006 4007 4008 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016

VTD: Memphis 75-6

Blocks (022330): 1000

VTD: Memphis 76-4

Blocks (022111): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007

Blocks (022322): 1000 1001 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 4000 4001 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008

VTD: Memphis 76-6

Blocks (022322): 1002 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009

VTD: Memphis 77-2

Blocks (022111): 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019

Blocks (022121): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007

Blocks (022700): 2000 2001 2003

VTD: Memphis 77-3

Blocks (022022): 4018

Blocks (022024): 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021

Blocks (022111): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008

VTD: Memphis 78-1

VTD: Memphis 78-3

Blocks (022022): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3021 4006 4007 4008 4009 4025 4026

Blocks (022023): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1012

VTD: Memphis 79-1

VTD: Memphis 79-2

Blocks (022121): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3000 3010 3011

VTD: Memphis 79-7

VTD: Memphis 79-8

Blocks (022022): 3012 3020 3022 3023 3024 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020 5021 5022 5023 5024 5025 5027 5028 5029 5030 5031 5032

Blocks (022112): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3014 3016

VTD: Memphis 92-1

Blocks (010820): 1010 4001 4002 4003

VTD: Memphis 93-3

Blocks (010820): 1001 1012

District 88:

Shelby County

VTD: Bartlett 06

Blocks (020621): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2021 2023 2024 2034

Blocks (020644): 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2040 2041

Blocks (020651): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1008 1009 1010 1011 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015

VTD: Bartlett 09

Blocks (020651): 1028

VTD: Bartlett 10

Blocks (020531): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1016 1017 1018 1019 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2014 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3040

Blocks (020532): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3013 3014 3015 3016 3018 3020 3021 3022 3032 3033

VTD: Bartlett 12

Blocks (020643): 4000 4005 4006 4007

VTD: Bartlett 13

VTD: Bartlett 14

Blocks (020531): 2000 2001 2002 2007 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3021 3038 3039 3041 3042

Blocks (020532): 3000 3031 4000 4001 4002

Blocks (020644): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1037 1038 1039 1040 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2038 2039 2042 2043 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018

VTD: Memphis 01

Blocks (011300): 1005

VTD: Memphis 02

Blocks (003900): 1026

Blocks (011400): 3006

VTD: Memphis 20-1

Blocks (002500): 2007 2008 2009 2010 2012 2013 2014 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037

Blocks (002600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025

VTD: Memphis 20-3

Blocks (002400): 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1030 1031 1033 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004

Blocks (002500): 1049 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049

Blocks (003900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025

Blocks (011300): 1063 1064 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096

Blocks (011400): 3005

VTD: Memphis 21

Blocks (001900): 2002 2003 2004 2008 2009 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2020 2021

Blocks (002400): 1004 1005 1008 1009 1016 1018 1019 1028 1029

VTD: Memphis 27

Blocks (000300): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014

Blocks (002000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023

Blocks (002400): 1006 1007 1017

Blocks (011300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1085 1098

VTD: Memphis 69-2

Blocks (010120): 5008 5013

VTD: Memphis 70-1

Blocks (010110): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2007 2008 2009 2011 5000 5001 5008 5009 5014 5015 6000 6001 6002 6011 6012 6013 6014 6015

VTD: Memphis 70-2

Blocks (000300): 1000 1001

Blocks (000400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1006 1007 2000 2001

Blocks (010120): 2004 2005 2006 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3007 3008 3009 3010 3012 3013 3014 3015 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5009 5010 5011 5012 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020 5021 5022 5023 5024 5025 5026 5027 5028 5029 5031

VTD: Memphis 71-3

VTD: Memphis 71-4

Blocks (010000): 1000 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018

Blocks (010300): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1013 1014 1015 1017 1018

VTD: Memphis 72-1

VTD: Memphis 72-3

VTD: Memphis 72-5

VTD: Memphis 84-2

Blocks (010220): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004

VTD: Memphis 87-3

Blocks (020644): 3010 3011 3013 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031

VTD: Memphis 88-2

VTD: Memphis 90-1

VTD: Memphis 90-2

Blocks (020521): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1012 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2017 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005

VTD: Woodstock 2

Blocks (010300): 1012

Blocks (020221): 2056 2096 2097

District 89:

Knox County

VTD: 39 Inskip Recreation Center

Blocks (003902): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1019 1020

VTD: 40 Norwood Elementary

VTD: 41 Norwood Library

VTD: 42 Pleasant Ridge

Blocks (004700): 1003 1004 1005 1006 2011 2012 2013

VTD: 43 West Haven

VTD: 44 Ridgedale

Blocks (004607): 1002 1003

Blocks (004700): 2002 2007 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2041

Blocks (006002): 2001 2003 2009

VTD: 55 Lonas

Blocks (004613): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011

VTD: 62 Hardin Valley

VTD: 62W Hardin Valley West

VTD: 63 Karns

VTD: 63N Karns North

VTD: 64 Solway

VTD: 65N Concord North

VTD: 66N Farragut I

Blocks (005803): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1063 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075

Blocks (005807): 1007 1026 1028 1033 1034 1035 1036

Blocks (005904): 2010 2018 2020 2027 2028 2029 2030 3006 3007 3013 3016 3018 3021 3029

VTD: 67 North Cedar Bluff

Blocks (004606): 1005 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1017 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019

VTD: 70 Ball Camp

District 90:

Shelby County

VTD: Memphis 02

Blocks (004300): 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051

Blocks (011400): 1008 1009 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1041 3010 3011

VTD: Memphis 11

VTD: Memphis 12

Blocks (004300): 1052 1070 1071

Blocks (011700): 1002 1003 1005 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1087 1088 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1140 1141 1142

VTD: Memphis 13

VTD: Memphis 15

VTD: Memphis 16-1

VTD: Memphis 17

VTD: Memphis 20-1

Blocks (001600): 1015 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 3003 3004

Blocks (002500): 2000 2001 2005 2006 2011

Blocks (002600): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

Blocks (003200): 2000 2001 2005 2006 2007

VTD: Memphis 20-3

Blocks (002400): 1014 1015 1020 1021 1022 1032

Blocks (002500): 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1048

VTD: Memphis 21

Blocks (000400): 1012 1013 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1034 1035 1038 1039 2024 2025 2026 2028 2029 2030 2031

Blocks (001900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 2000 2001 2005 2006 2007 2010 2017 2018 2019

Blocks (002400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1010 1011 1012 1013

Blocks (002500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1035 1047

Blocks (011200): 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020

VTD: Memphis 25-2

Blocks (005900): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2035 2036 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031

Blocks (011600): 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1042 1043 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2034 2035 2036

VTD: Memphis 26-1

Blocks (006200): 1018 1019 1020 1024 2000 2001 2003 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004

Blocks (011500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1007 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2015 2016 3000 3001 3002

VTD: Memphis 28

Blocks (003100): 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022

VTD: Memphis 29-2

Blocks (006600): 2001

Blocks (006700): 1003

VTD: Memphis 31-1

Blocks (006300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1008 1009 3014

Blocks (006400): 1002 1004

VTD: Memphis 31-2

VTD: Memphis 31-4

Blocks (006400): 1003 1005

VTD: Memphis 32

VTD: Memphis 33

VTD: Memphis 34-2

Blocks (005700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1054 1055 1056 1057

VTD: Memphis 35-1

Blocks (005300): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 3006

Blocks (005500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029

VTD: Memphis 36-1

Blocks (000700): 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029

Blocks (001600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1016 1017 1042 2012 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 3000 3001 3002

Blocks (001700): 1040 1041 1042 1043 1045 1046 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 3017 3018

Blocks (002500): 2002

VTD: Memphis 36-2

Blocks (000700): 1020 1021

Blocks (001600): 2000 2001

Blocks (001700): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018

Blocks (011200): 2000 2009

VTD: Memphis 36-3

Blocks (001700): 1022 1023 1047 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016

Blocks (002500): 2003 2004

VTD: Memphis 40-1

VTD: Memphis 40-2

VTD: Memphis 41-1

Blocks (000600): 1017 1018

VTD: Memphis 41-3

Blocks (000600): 1021

Blocks (000700): 1000 1001 1002 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2000 2001 2004 2005 2006 2007 2014 2015 2016 2017 3000 3015

VTD: Memphis 45-1

Blocks (003100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1013 2000

Blocks (006600): 2000

Blocks (006700): 1000 1001 1002

Blocks (007100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008

VTD: Memphis 50-1

Blocks (005300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026

VTD: Memphis 52-2

Blocks (001500): 1013 1016 1022 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012

VTD: Memphis 72-7

Blocks (000600): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1045

Blocks (010220): 1005 3012 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4026 4027 4028 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 6000 6001 6002 6003 6004 6005 6006 6007 6008 6009 6010 6011 6012 6013 6014 6015 6016 6017 6018 6019 6020 6021 6022 6023 6024 6025 6026 6027 6028 6030 6033

Blocks (020511): 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2011 2021 2022 2023

District 91:

Shelby County

VTD: Memphis 26-1

Blocks (006500): 2005 2006 2007 2015 2018

VTD: Memphis 28

Blocks (003100): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013

Blocks (006600): 2008 2009 2010 2011 2014

VTD: Memphis 29-1

Blocks (006500) 1000 1001 1002 1003 2000

Blocks (006600): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 2007 2012 2013 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2044 2045 2046 2047 2049 2050 2051

Blocks (006700): 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033

VTD: Memphis 29-2

Blocks (006600): 1019

VTD: Memphis 31-1

Blocks (006300): 1006 1007 1011 1012 1013 1015 1016 3000 3001 3004 3005 3006 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013

Blocks (006400): 1000 1001 1010 1014

VTD: Memphis 31-4

Blocks (006500): 1004 1005 2001 2002 2003 2004 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014

VTD: Memphis 35-1

Blocks (005500): 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049

Blocks (022220): 1000 1001 1002

Blocks (022500): 1028 1029

VTD: Memphis 44-1

Blocks (002900): 1017 1018

VTD: Memphis 44-2

Blocks (002900): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020

Blocks (008600): 2027 2028 2029

VTD: Memphis 44-3

Blocks (002900): 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018

Blocks (007300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1014 1015 1016 1017

VTD: Memphis 46-1

Blocks (007300): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3018

VTD: Memphis 46-2

Blocks (007400): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2027

VTD: Memphis 47-1

Blocks (006500): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028

Blocks (006800): 2008 2010 2011

Blocks (006900): 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 3007 3008 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022

Blocks (007810): 3002 3003 3004 3005 3007 3014

Blocks (008110): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004

VTD: Memphis 48

Blocks (006000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1032 1033 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011

Blocks (006500): 2016 2017 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024

Blocks (007810): 3000 3001

VTD: Memphis 49

Blocks (005600): 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3010 3011 3012 3013 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056

Blocks (007500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2015

Blocks (007810): 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057

Blocks (022500): 1026 1027

VTD: Memphis 58-4

Blocks (008200): 1002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 5000 5001 5002 5007 5008 5009

Blocks (011800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 2000 2001 2002 2003 2007 2008 2009 2010 2013 2014 2018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3008 3009 3010 3011 3013 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 4001 4002 4003 4004 4007 4008 4009

VTD: Memphis 59-5

Blocks (008110): 1005 1006 1007

Blocks (008120): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3018 3019 4000 4001 4002

VTD: Memphis 60-1

VTD: Memphis 60-2

Blocks (008110): 1008 1009 1011 1012 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

Blocks (008120): 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007

Blocks (980100): 1013 1014 1015 1016 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1036 1053 1054 1055 1075

VTD: Memphis 60-3

VTD: Memphis 60-4

VTD: Memphis 60-6

VTD: Memphis 60-8

VTD: Memphis 60-9

VTD: Memphis 65-1

Blocks (008500): 1032

Blocks (011800): 4005 4006 4010 4012

VTD: Memphis 73-1

Blocks (008120): 3017

Blocks (008200): 1011 1012

Blocks (010500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1016 1017 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004

Blocks (980100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1103

VTD: Memphis 73-3

Blocks (010610): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022

Blocks (010630): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012

VTD: Memphis 74-5

Blocks (010610): 1015

VTD: Memphis 75-1

Blocks (022220): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1017 1018 1020 1021 4000 4001 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017

VTD: Memphis 75-6

Blocks (022310): 4012

VTD: Memphis 75-7

Blocks (022310): 1000 1001 1002 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4009 4010 4011

Blocks (022321): 3020

VTD: Memphis 76-4

Blocks (022321): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 3021 3022 3028

VTD: Memphis 77-1

VTD: Memphis 77-3

Blocks (022500): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009

VTD: Memphis 78-3

Blocks (022022): 1014 1015 1016 1017

Blocks (022023): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018

District 92:

Franklin County

VTD: 3-2 Huntland

Blocks (960800): 1126 1127 1128 1129 1133 1134 1135 1136 1140 1141 1157 1160 1161 1162 1163 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171 1172 1173 1174 1175 1176 1180 1182 1183

VTD: 5-1 Keith Springs

Blocks (960600): 3079 3081 3082 3083 3084 3086 3087 3090 3091 3093 3101 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3116 3119 3120 3121 3122

Blocks (960700): 2115

VTD: 5-3 Sherwood

Blocks (960600): 3118

Blocks (960700): 2075 2076 2078 2079 2080 2082 2083 2084 2086 2087 2090 2091 2092 2093 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2116 2117 2118 2119 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2144 2145 2146 2147

Lincoln County

VTD: Blanche School

VTD: Boonshill Community Center

Blocks (975200): 1001 1003 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1120 1121 1122 1123 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2146 2147 2148 2149 2150 2151 2152 2153 2154 2155 2156 2157 2158 2159 2160 2161 2162 2163 2164 2166 2167 2168

Blocks (975300): 4009 4010 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4033 4034

VTD: Elora Community Center

VTD: Flintville Fire Hall

VTD: FNB Community Room

VTD: Highland Rim School

VTD: Lincoln Community Center

VTD: Molino

VTD: South Lincoln

Blocks (975500): 1113 1114 1115 3034 3035 3036 3039 3040 3041 3042 3044

Blocks (975601): 1011 1012 1013 1014 1025 1028 1029

VTD: Taft Firehall

Marion County

VTD: Cedar Grove

VTD: Jasper

VTD: Kimball

VTD: Lodge

VTD: New Hope

VTD: Orme

VTD: Shellmound

VTD: South Pittsburg

Marshall County

District 93:

Shelby County

VTD: Memphis 29-1

Blocks (006600): 2005 2006 2020

VTD: Memphis 29-2

Blocks (006600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1020 1021 1028 1029 1030 2002 2003 2004 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2042 2043 2048

Blocks (006700): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 4001 4002 4006 4007

VTD: Memphis 37

VTD: Memphis 38-2

VTD: Memphis 41-3

Blocks (000800): 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015

Blocks (000900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005

VTD: Memphis 43-2

Blocks (011100): 1018 1054

VTD: Memphis 44-1

Blocks (001200): 1013

Blocks (002900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1019 1020 1021 1022 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020

Blocks (008600): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018

Blocks (008700): 2015 3013 3014

VTD: Memphis 44-2

Blocks (002900): 3006 3007

VTD: Memphis 44-3

Blocks (007300): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1018

VTD: Memphis 44-4

VTD: Memphis 44-5

VTD: Memphis 45-1

Blocks (007100): 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013

VTD: Memphis 45-2

VTD: Memphis 45-4

VTD: Memphis 46-1

Blocks (007300): 2000 2001 2002 2003 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017

VTD: Memphis 46-2

Blocks (007400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2013 2014 2015 2025 2026 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032

VTD: Memphis 47-1

Blocks (006800): 2009 2012 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010

Blocks (006900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3009 3010

Blocks (007900): 4004 4005 4006 4007

VTD: Memphis 52-1

VTD: Memphis 52-2

Blocks (001500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002

VTD: Memphis 52-3

VTD: Memphis 53-1

Blocks (001100): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1016 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

Blocks (001200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019

Blocks (008800): 4011 4012

Blocks (011100): 1031 1032 1034 1035 1037 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1059 1060 1061

VTD: Memphis 54

Blocks (008600): 1000 1001 1012 1013 1022 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3024 3025 3026

Blocks (008700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2016 3000 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018

VTD: Memphis 58-1

VTD: Memphis 58-4

Blocks (008200): 1000 1001 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1013 2003 2004 2005 2007 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 5003 5004 5005 5006

VTD: Memphis 59-1

VTD: Memphis 59-5

Blocks (008120): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031

VTD: Memphis 61

District 94:

Fayette County

Hardeman County

VTD: Grand Junction

Blocks (950600): 1091 1092 1093 1094 1097 1098 1104 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1119 1120 1122 1125 1126 1132 1134 1135 1143 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1153 1154 1155 1168 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2181 2182 2183 2184 2197 2198 2199 2200

VTD: Middleton

Blocks (950500): 1072 1073 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 3017 3023 3025 3029 3030 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110 3111 3112 3113 3114 3115 3116 3117 3118 3119 3120 3121 3122 3123 3124 3125 3126 3127 3128 3129 3130 3131 3132

Blocks (950600): 2164

VTD: Pocahontas

Blocks (950500): 2079 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2119 2120 2121 2142

VTD: Saulsbury

Blocks (950600): 2057 2058 2059 2062 2063 2070 2072 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2118 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2146 2147 2148 2149 2150 2151 2152 2153 2154 2155 2156 2157 2158 2159 2160 2161 2162 2163 2165 2166 2167 2168 2169 2170 2171 2172 2173 2174 2175 2176 2177 2178 2179 2185 2186 2191 2192 2193 2194 2195 2196

McNairy County

District 95:

Shelby County

VTD: Collierville 09

VTD: Collierville 1

VTD: Collierville 2

VTD: Collierville 3

VTD: Collierville 4

VTD: Collierville 5

VTD: Collierville 6

VTD: Collierville 7

VTD: Cordova 3

Blocks (021020): 1058 1059 1060 1061

VTD: Eads

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021520): 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1064 1065 1066 1067 2162 2163 2164 2165 2166 2167 2220 2221

VTD: Germantown 03

Blocks (021351): 1000 1006 1010 1011 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025

VTD: Germantown 04

VTD: Germantown 08

VTD: Germantown 11

VTD: Germantown 12

VTD: Morning Sun 02

Blocks (021020): 1003 1004 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1039 1040 1048 1049 1050 1051 1053 1055 1056 1057

District 96:

Shelby County

VTD: Cordova 10

VTD: Cordova 3

Blocks (021020): 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1037 1038 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078

Blocks (021136): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2062 2063 2064 2065

Blocks (021138): 1000 1001 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015

Blocks (021139): 1000 1001 1006 1007 1008 1010 1011 1025 1026 1030 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014

VTD: Cordova 4

VTD: Cordova 9

VTD: Germantown 01

VTD: Germantown 05

VTD: Memphis 89-2

Blocks (980400): 1002 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058

VTD: Memphis 91-1

Blocks (021124): 1057

Blocks (021125): 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1039 1040 1041 1052 1055 2022 2027

Blocks (021135): 3012 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3043 3044 3045 3046

Blocks (021136): 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2067 2068

Blocks (021137): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053

VTD: Memphis 91-2

VTD: Memphis 91-3

VTD: Memphis 95-5

VTD: Memphis 95-6

VTD: Memphis 95-7

VTD: Morning Sun 01

VTD: Morning Sun 02

Blocks (021010): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1047

Blocks (021020): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1029 1030 1072

District 97:

Shelby County

VTD: Bartlett 02

VTD: Bartlett 03

VTD: Bartlett 08

VTD: Bartlett 09

Blocks (020651): 2014 2019 2020

Blocks (020652): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018

VTD: Bartlett 12

Blocks (020643): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 4008 4009 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024

VTD: Cordova 5

VTD: Cordova 6

VTD: Memphis 55-1

VTD: Memphis 55-2

VTD: Memphis 57

VTD: Memphis 63-2

VTD: Memphis 88-3

Blocks (020610): 1033 1035 1036 1037 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 2000 2004 2015 2018 2019 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

Blocks (020621): 5000 5008 5016 5017

Blocks (020622): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008

VTD: Memphis 89-1

VTD: Memphis 89-2

Blocks (021121): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019

Blocks (021122): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014

Blocks (021200): 1001

Blocks (980400): 1000 1001 1003 1004 1041 1042 1043 1045 1046

VTD: Memphis 91-1

Blocks (021125): 1038 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1053 1054

VTD: Memphis 95-1
